Texas statutes.
NATURAL RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 5. GEOTHERMAL ENERGY AND ASSOCIATED RESOURCES

CHAPTER 142. NATURAL ENERGY AND WATER RESOURCES COMPACT

Sec. 142.001. RATIFICATION. The compact set out in Section 142.005 of this code is ratified by this state.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2001, ch. 785, Sec. 4, eff. June 13, 1979.

Sec. 142.002. APPOINTMENT OF COMMISSIONERS. When the compact takes effect as provided in Article I, the governor, the lieutenant governor, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint a commissioner.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2001, ch. 785, Sec. 4, eff. June 13, 1979.

Sec. 142.003. TERMS AND OATH OF COMMISSIONERS. (a) Each commissioner serves a term of two years and until his successor is appointed and has qualified.

(b) Each commissioner shall take the constitutional oath of office and shall also take an oath to faithfully perform his duties as commissioner.

(c) If a vacancy occurs in the office of commissioner, the original appointing officer shall appoint a successor to serve for the unexpired portion of the term.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2001, ch. 785, Sec. 4, eff. June 13, 1979.

Sec. 142.004. COMPENSATION. Each commissioner is entitled to compensation and reimbursement for expenses as provided by legislative appropriation.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2001, ch. 785, Sec. 4, eff. June 13, 1979.

Sec. 142.005. TEXT OF COMPACT. The compact reads as follows:

Article I. The states of Arkansas, Louisiana, New Mexico, Oklahoma, and Texas are eligible to ratify this compact. When three of those states have ratified it, the compact takes effect as to those three states. It takes effect as to others of them when they ratify it.

Article II. (a) The purposes of this compact are to:

(1) provide for the conservation and wise utilization of natural energy and water resources by party states;

(2) establish the relative importance of different types of natural energy and water resources being used;

(3) promote comity among the party states and remove causes of present and future controversies;

(4) foster the expeditious development of agriculture and industry in the party states; and

(5) give priority to the exchange of natural energy and water resources among the party states.

(b) To accomplish the purposes of this compact, the party states pledge their mutual cooperation and their intention to develop and execute appropriate programs.

Article III. (a) This compact applies within each party state to individuals, associations, corporations, and governmental and private entities claiming any right to the use of the natural energy or water resources in a party state, except as otherwise provided in this compact.

(b) Each party state agrees that within a reasonable time it may enact laws designed to promote a free flow of natural energy and water resources among all party states. These laws will not apply to states that are not parties to this compact.

Article IV. (a) An administrative agency known as the Interstate Natural Energy and Water Resources Commission is created. Each party state shall appoint, in accordance with its laws, three members of the commission. Members of the commission are known as commissioners.

(b) The commission shall conduct studies and make recommendations to the party states regarding the conservation and wise utilization of natural energy and water resources by those states. It shall recommend to the party states methods of coordinating the exercise of state power to promote maximum conservation and utilization of natural energy and water resources.

(c) The commission may meet as often as it considers necessary, but it must meet at least once each year. At least once each year the commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature of each party state.

(d) The commission shall organize and adopt rules and bylaws for conducting its business. It shall adopt a seal. The commission may not act on any matter except by an affirmative vote of a majority of all commissioners serving on the commission.

(e) The commission shall elect annually from among its members a chairman, vice-chairman, and treasurer. It shall appoint a director who serves at its pleasure. The director is also secretary of the commission. The director and treasurer shall be bonded in an amount and in a manner determined by the commission. The director is responsible for the appointment and discharge of personnel. He shall establish personnel policies, retirement programs, and employee benefit programs, subject to the approval of the commission.

(f) The commission shall establish and maintain such facilities as it considers necessary for transacting its business.

(g) For the purposes of this compact, the commission may accept and use gifts or grants of money, equipment, or supplies from any public or private legal entity and may accept and use the services of personnel made available to it by any public or private legal entity.

Article V. (a) Nothing in this compact shall be construed as:

(1) affecting the jurisdiction of any interstate agency in which a party state participates;

(2) affecting the provisions of any interstate compact to which a member state is a party, or any obligation of a member state under such a compact;

(3) discouraging additional interstate compacts in which one or more parties to this compact may be a party;

(4) discouraging the coordination of activities regarding a specific natural resource or any aspect of natural resource management;

(5) discouraging the establishment of intergovernmental planning agencies within the area of the states that are party to this compact; or

(6) limiting the jurisdiction or activities of any participating government or any agency or officer of a participating government except as expressly provided in this compact.

Article VI. The commission shall submit to the governor and legislature of each party state a budget of its estimated expenditures for a period of time as is appropriate, based on the laws of that state. Each budget of estimated expenditures shall contain specific recommendations as to the apportionment of costs among the party states.

Article VII. Any party state may, by legislative act and one year's notice, withdraw from this compact.

Article VIII. The provisions of this compact are severable. If any provision or application of it is held invalid, that does not affect the validity of any other provision or application. The provisions of this compact shall be construed liberally to accomplish its purposes.

Article IX. This compact does not seek to affect political balance within the federal system and shall not be construed as requiring the consent of congress under Article I, Section 10, United States Constitution.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2001, ch. 785, Sec. 4, eff. June 13, 1979.